Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-6302
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Disclosure of Material Insurance Transactions Act:

(1) Director shall mean the Director of Insurance; and

(2) Insurer shall mean an insurer as defined in section 44-103 authorized to transact the business of insurance in this state, except that insurer shall include health maintenance organizations and insurer shall not include unincorporated mutual associations and assessment associations.

Laws 1994, LB 978, § 2.